hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Glazbala > Gajde: Škotske gajde; Irske gajde; Northumbrijske gajde; Škotske male gajde; Irske male gajde
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszerek > Dudák: Nagyfelvidéki duda; Ír háborús duda; Northumbriai dudák; Skót kisdudák; Uilleann dudák
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Muziekinstrumenten > Doedelzakken: Great Highland-doedelzakken; Ierse warpipes; Northumbrian pipes; Schotse smallpipes; Uilleann pipes
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Instrumentos musicais > Gaitas de foles: Gaitas de foles Great Highland; Gaitas de foles Warpipes irlandesas; Gaitas de foles nortumbrianas; Gaitas de foles Smallpipes escoceses; Gaitas de foles Uilleann irlandesas
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai > Dūdmaišiai: Didieji kalniečių dūdmaišiai; Didieji airiški karo dūdmaišiai; Nortumbriški dūdmaišiai; Mažieji škotiški dūdmaišiai; Airiški dūdmaišiai
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Glasbila > Dude: Škotske dude; Irske dude; Severnoumbrijske dude; Škotske majhne dude; Irske dude
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기 > 백파이프: 그레이트 하이랜드 백파이프; 아이리시 백파이프; 노썸브리안 파이프; 스코티시 스몰파이프; 일리언 파이프
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Nhạc cụ > Kèn túi: Kèn túi Great Highland; Kèn túi Ailen; Kèn Northumbria; Kèn nhỏ Scotland; Kèn Uilleann
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器 > 风笛: 苏格兰风笛; 爱尔兰战地风笛; 诺森伯兰管; 小风笛; 爱尔兰肘风笛
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Musikinstrumente > Dudelsäcke: Great-Highland-Dudelsäcke; Irische Warpipes; Northumbrian Pipes; Schottische Smallpipes; Uilleann Pipes
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Instrumentos musicales > Gaitas: Grandes cornamusas de las Tierras Altas; Grandes cornamusas irlandesas de guerra; Cornamusas de Northumbria; Pequeñas cornamusas escocesas; Cornamusas irlandesas
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Strumenti musicali > Cornamuse: Cornamuse scozzesi; Cornamuse irlandesi; Cornamuse della Northumbria; Cornamuse della Scozia; Uilleann Pipes
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Hudobné nástroje > Gajdy: Škótske gajdy; Írske gajdy; Northumbrijské gajdy; Škótske malé gajdy; Írske gajdy
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter > Sækkepiber: Great Highland-sækkepiber; Irske krigspiber; Northumbriske piber; Skotske småpiber; Uilleann piber
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Instrumente muzicale > Cimpoaie: Cimpoaie scoțiene; Cimpoaie irlandeze; Cimpoi Northumberland; Cimpoaie mici scoțiene; Cimpoaie irlandeze
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Instrumenty muzyczne > Dudy: Great Highland Bagpipes; Irish Warpipes; Northumbrian Pipes; Scottish Smallpipes; Uilleann Pipes
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soittimet > Säkkipillit: Skotlantilaiset säkkipillit; Irlantilaiset sotasäkkipillit; Northumbrian säkkipillit; Skottisäkkipillit; Irlantilaiset säkkipillit
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรี > ปี่สก็อต: ปี่สก็อตเกรทไฮแลนด์; ไอริชวอร์ไปป์; นอร์ธัมเบรียนไปป์; สก็อตติช สมอลไปป์; อีเลียนไปป์
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Μουσικά όργανα > Γκάιντες: Σκωτσέζικες γκάιντες; Ιρλανδικές πολεμικές γκάιντες; Γκάιντες τύπου Northumbrian; Μικρές Σκωτσέζικες γκάιντες; Ιρλανδικές γκάιντες Uilleann
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器 > 風笛: 大高地風笛; 愛爾蘭戰地風笛; 諾森布里亞風笛; 蘇格蘭室樂風笛; 愛爾蘭風笛
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Instruments de musique > Cornemuses: Grande cornemuse des Highlands; Cornemuses irlandaises; Pipes de Northumbrie; Petites cornemuses écossaises; Cornemuses irlandaises Uilleann
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Музикални инструменти > Гайди: Големи шотландски гайди; Ирландски бойни гайди; Нортумбрийски гайди; Шотландски малки гайди; Ирландски гайди
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Musikkinstrumenter > Sekkepiper: Great Highland-sekkepiper; Irske warpipes; Northumbrian-sekkepiper; Skotske småpiper; Uilleann-piper
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Instrumentos musicais > Gaita de fole: Grandes gaitas de fole das terras altas; Gaitas de guerra irlandesas; Gaitas da Nortúmbria; Gaitas pequenas escocesas; Gaitas Uilleann
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Musikinstrument > Säckpipor: Great Highland säckpipor; Irländska säckpipor; Northumbrian säckpipor; Skotska små säckpipor; Uilleann säckpipor
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aletleri > Gaydalar: Great Highland Gaydaları; İrlanda Gaydaları; Northumbrian Gaydaları; İskoç Gaydaları; Uilleann Gaydaları
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Музыкальные инструменты > Волынки: Большие шотландские волынки; Большие ирландские волынки; Нортумбрийские волынки; Малые шотландские волынки; Ирландские волынки
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje > Dudy: Skotské dudy; Irské dudy; Dudy Northumbrian; Malé skotské dudy; Loketní dudy (Uilleann)
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器 > バグパイプ: グレート ハイランド バグパイプ; アイリッシュ ワーパイプ; ノーサンブリアンパイプ; スコッティッシュ スモールパイプ; イリアンパイプス
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instruments > Bagpipes: Great Highland Bagpipes; Irish Warpipes; Northumbrian Pipes; Scottish Smallpipes; Uilleann Pipes